nl: Inbegrepen accessoires drumpedaal: Inclusief kloppers; Inclusief draagtas/-koffer; Inclusief verbindingsas voor dubbel pedaal; Inclusief drumsleutel; Inclusief extra kam; Inclusief extra veren; Inclusief extra riem/band; Inclusief spanrandbeschermer; Inclusief gebruikershandleiding; Anders
tr: Dahil edilen davul pedalı aksesuarları: Tokmaklar dahil; Taşıma çantası/kılıfı dahil; Çift pedal bağlantısı dahil; Bateri anahtarı dahil; Ekstra kam dahil; Ekstra yaylar dahil; Ekstra kayış/kemer dahil; Kasnak koruyucu dahil; Kullanım kılavuzu dahil; Diğer
sl-SI: Vključeni dodatki za pedal za boben: Vključena udarjala; Vključena torba/kovček za prenašanje; Vključen povezovalni element za dvojni pedal; Vključen ključ za bobne; Vključen dodatni ekscenter (cam); Vključene dodatne vzmeti; Vključen dodaten trak/pas; Vključena zaščita obroča; Vključena navodila za uporabo; Drugo
en: Drum pedal accessories included: Beaters included; Carry bag/case included; Double pedal linkage included; Drum key included; Extra cam included; Extra springs included; Extra strap/belt included; Hoop protector included; User manual included; Other
nb: Inkludert trommepedal-tilbehør: Køller inkludert; Bæreveske/-koffert inkludert; Dobbeltpedalforbindelse inkludert; Trommenøkkel inkludert; Ekstra kam inkludert; Ekstra fjærer inkludert; Ekstra reim/belte inkludert; Kantbeskytter inkludert; Brukermanual inkludert; Annet
pt-BR: Acessórios para o pedal do tambor incluídos: Batedores incluídos; Bolsa/estojo de transporte incluído; Conector de pedal duplo incluído; Chave de bateria incluída; Came extra incluída; Molas extras incluídas; Tira/correia extra incluída; Protetor de aro incluído; Manual do usuário incluído; Outros
bg-BG: Включени аксесоари за педал за барабан: Включени тупалки; Включена чанта/калъф за пренасяне; Включен свързващ вал за двоен педал; Включен ключ за барабани; Включен допълнителен ексцентрик; Включени допълнителни пружини; Включена допълнителна каишка/ремък; Включен протектор за обръч; Включено ръководство за потребителя; Друго
zh-CN: 包括鼓踏板配件: 含踩槌; 含便携包/箱; 含双踏板连杆; 含鼓钥匙; 含备用凸轮; 含备用弹簧; 含备用绑带/传送带; 含鼓圈保护垫; 含用户手册; 其他
fi: Rumpupedaalin mukana tulevat lisävarusteet: Sisältää nuijat; Sisältää kantokassin/-kotelon; Sisältää kaksoispedaalin yhdystangon; Sisältää rumpuavaimen; Sisältää ylimääräisen vetopyörän (cam); Sisältää ylimääräiset jouset; Sisältää ylimääräisen hihnan; Sisältää vannesuojan; Sisältää käyttöoppaan; Muu
vi: Phụ kiện đi kèm của bàn đạp trống: Bao gồm búa đạp; Bao gồm túi/hộp đựng; Bao gồm thanh nối pedal đôi; Bao gồm khóa trống; Bao gồm cam dự phòng; Bao gồm lò xo dự phòng; Bao gồm đai/dây đai dự phòng; Bao gồm tấm bảo vệ vành; Bao gồm hướng dẫn sử dụng; Khác
ko: 드럼 페달 액세서리 포함: 비터 포함; 휴대용 가방/케이스 포함; 더블 페달 링키지 포함; 드럼 키 포함; 여분 캠 포함; 여분 스프링 포함; 여분 스트랩/벨트 포함; 후프 프로텍터 포함; 사용 설명서 포함; 기타
lt-LT: Į komplektą įeinantus būgno pedalų priedai: Pridedami muštukai; Pridedamas nešiojimo krepšys / dėklas; Pridedama dvigubo pedalo jungtis; Pridedamas būgno raktas; Pridedamas papildomas kumštelis; Pridedamos papildomos spyruoklės; Pridedamas papildomas dirželis / diržas; Pridedama lanko apsauga; Pridedamas naudotojo vadovas; Kita
de: Inbegriffenes Drum-Pedal-Zubehör: Inklusive Beater; Inklusive Tragetasche/-koffer; Inklusive Doppelpedal-Verbindungswelle; Inklusive Stimmschlüssel; Inklusive zusätzlichem Cam; Inklusive zusätzlicher Federn; Inklusive zusätzlichem Zugband/Riemen; Inklusive Spannreifenschutz; Inklusive Bedienungsanleitung; Sonstige
th: อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับกระเดื่องกลองที่รวมอยู่ในชุด: รวมหัวกระเดื่อง; รวมกระเป๋า/เคสพกพา; รวมก้านต่อกระเดื่องคู่; รวมกุญแจกลอง; รวมแคมเสริม; รวมสปริงเสริม; รวมสายรัด/เข็มขัดเสริม; รวมตัวป้องกันขอบกลอง; รวมคู่มือการใช้งาน; อื่นๆ
el: Περιλαμβάνονται αξεσουάρ πεντάλ τυμπάνου: Περιλαμβάνονται κόπανοι; Περιλαμβάνεται τσάντα/θήκη μεταφοράς; Περιλαμβάνεται σύνδεσμος διπλού πεντάλ; Περιλαμβάνεται κλειδί τυμπάνων; Περιλαμβάνεται πρόσθετο έκκεντρο; Περιλαμβάνονται πρόσθετα ελατήρια; Περιλαμβάνεται πρόσθετος ιμάντας/ζώνη; Περιλαμβάνεται προστατευτικό στεφανιού; Περιλαμβάνεται εγχειρίδιο χρήστη; Άλλο
pt-PT: Acessórios para o pedal da bateria incluídos: Batedores incluídos; Saco/estojo de transporte incluído; Ligação de pedal duplo incluída; Chave de afinação incluída; Cames extra incluída; Molas extra incluídas; Correia/cinto extra incluído; Protetor de aro incluído; Manual de utilizador incluído; Outro
es: Accesorios de pedal de batería incluidos: Mazas incluidas; Bolsa de transporte/estuche incluido; Eje de conexión de pedal doble incluido; Llave de afinación incluida; Leva adicional incluida; Resortes adicionales incluidos; Correa extra incluida; Protector de aro incluido; Manual de usuario incluido; Otro
cs: Včetně příslušenství k pedálu bicích: Včetně beaterů; Včetně přepravní tašky / pouzdra; Včetně propojení pro dvojitý pedál; Včetně ladicího klíče; Včetně náhradní vačky; Včetně náhradních pružin; Včetně náhradního pásku / řemínku; Včetně chrániče ráfku; Včetně uživatelské příručky; Ostatní
sk-SK: Vrátane príslušenstva k bubeníckej šľapke: Beatery sú súčasťou balenia; Prepravná taška/puzdro je súčasťou balenia; Spojovací hriadeľ pre dvojitý pedál je súčasťou balenia; Ladiaci kľúč je súčasťou balenia; Náhradná vačka je súčasťou balenia; Náhradné pružiny sú súčasťou balenia; Náhradný remeň je súčasťou balenia; Chránič obruče je súčasťou balenia; Používateľská príručka je súčasťou balenia; Iné
ja: ドラムペダルアクセサリー付き: ビーター付き; キャリーバッグ/ケース付き; ダブルペダルリンケージ付き; ドラムキー付き; エクストラカム付き; エクストラスプリング付き; エクストラストラップ/ベルト付き; フーププロテクター付き; ユーザーマニュアル付き; その他
sv: Medföljande tillbehör till trumpedal: Klubbor ingår; Bärväska/fodral ingår; Länkage för dubbelpedal ingår; Trumnyckel ingår; Extra kam ingår; Extra fjädrar ingår; Extra rem/bälte ingår; Sargskydd ingår; Bruksanvisning ingår; Övrigt
fr: Accessoires pour pédale de batterie inclus: Battes incluses; Housse/étui de transport inclus; Tige de liaison pour double pédale incluse; Clé de batterie incluse; Came supplémentaire incluse; Ressorts supplémentaires inclus; Sangle/courroie supplémentaire incluse; Protecteur de cerclage inclus; Manuel d’utilisation inclus; Autre
it: Accessori per pedale del tamburo inclusi: Battenti inclusi; Borsa/custodia inclusa; Barra di collegamento per doppio pedale inclusa; Chiavetta per batteria inclusa; Camma extra inclusa; Molle extra incluse; Cinghia/cintura extra inclusa; Proteggi cerchio incluso; Manuale utente incluso; Altro
da: Trommepedaltilbehør medfølger: Køller medfølger; Bæretaske/-kasse medfølger; Dobbeltpedal-forbindelse medfølger; Trommenøgle medfølger; Ekstra knast medfølger; Ekstra fjedre medfølger; Ekstra strop/rem medfølger; Reifebeskytter medfølger; Brugermanual medfølger; Andet
ru: Аксессуары педали барабана: Колотушки в комплекте; Сумка/чехол для переноски в комплекте; Карданный вал в комплекте; Барабанный ключ в комплекте; Запасной эксцентрик (кулачок) в комплекте; Запасные пружины в комплекте; Запасной ремешок в комплекте; Защита обода в комплекте; Руководство пользователя в комплекте; Другое
ro-RO: Accesorii incluse pentru pedala tobei: Ciocănele incluse; Geantă/husă de transport inclusă; Tijă de legătură pentru pedală dublă inclusă; Cheie de tobe inclusă; Camă suplimentară inclusă; Arcuri suplimentare incluse; Curea/bandă suplimentară inclusă; Protecție pentru cerc inclusă; Manual de utilizare inclus; Altele
pl: Dołączono akcesoria do stopy perkusyjnej: Bijaki w zestawie; Torba transportowa / futerał w zestawie; Łącznik do podwójnego pedału w zestawie; Klucz perkusyjny w zestawie; Dodatkowa krzywka w zestawie; Dodatkowe sprężyny w zestawie; Dodatkowy pasek w zestawie; Ochraniacz na obręcz w zestawie; Instrukcja obsługi w zestawie; Inne
zh-TW: 包含鼓踏板配件: 含鼓槌; 含攜行袋/箱; 含雙踏板連接桿; 含鼓鎖; 含額外凸輪; 含額外彈簧; 含額外綁帶/皮帶; 含鼓框保護墊; 含使用手冊; 其他
hr-HR: Uključeni dodaci za pedalu bubnja: Uključeni batići; Uključena torba/kofer za nošenje; Uključena spojka za dvostruku pedalu; Uključen ključ za bubnjeve; Uključen dodatni ekscentar; Uključene dodatne opruge; Uključen dodatni remen/traka; Uključen štitnik za obruč; Uključene upute za upotrebu; Ostalo
hu: Dobpedál tartozékok a csomagban: Ütőfejekkel; Hordtáskával/tokkal; Duplapedál-összekötővel; Dobkulccsal; Extra lánckerékkel (cam); Extra rugókkal; Extra pánttal/szíjjal; Kávavédővel; Használati útmutatóval; Egyéb